North Dakota, session 69, HB1519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 23-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Death and vaccination records.
1. The department of health and human services shall compile and maintain individual
death and vaccination records for each vaccine type for which there are records in the
North Dakota immunization information system.
2. For each individual appearing in the electronic death registration system and the North
Dakota immunization information system, the department shall record the following
information: unique identifying number, sex, race, date of birth, date of death, vaccine
manufacturer, vaccine type, date of vaccination, dose number, lot number, vaccine
provider, and vaccination location.
3. Within thirty days of the end of each calendar quarter, the department of health and
human services shall publish on its website a time-series summary report based on
the individual death and vaccination records for each vaccine type that has been
administered to more than twenty-thousand individuals in this state over the last
quarter. The summary report must :
a. Cover all qualifying vaccines administered in this state in the last two years.
b. Include the following index columns:
(1) Month and year of administration;
Page No. 1 25.1294.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) Sex;
(3) Birth year;
(4) Vaccine manufacturer ;
(5) Vaccine type; and
(6) Dose number.
c. Include the following value columns:
(1) Total number of vaccines administered for the indexed cohort; and
(2) Total number of deaths for the indexed cohort occurring within one, three,
seven, fourteen, twenty-one, and thirty days of the exact vaccination date
and continuing with columns reporting the total number of deaths for
additional thirty-day intervals through seven hundred twenty days since
vaccination, with the total deaths counted for each interval being cumulative
up to that period.
4. A redaction may not be made to a report under subsection 3 unless the department o f
health and human services is expressly notified of a privacy issue regarding the
metrics counted under subsection 3 .
Page No. 2 25.1294.02000